New Jersey, session 222, S3026.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Mobile application means an application designed to be downloaded onto and used in conjunction with a mobile electronic communication device, as defined herein, and available through multiple software platforms. Mobile electronic communication device means any mobile device capable of communication or other transmission of information and includes, but is not limited to, a cellular telephone, wireless tablet, or other device with Internet capability, or other wireless communication device. b.    The State Lottery Commission, in consultation with the State Treasurer, shall implement a program that allows residents of this State to submit a lottery claim form and validate a lottery claim for a winning ticket or prize of $600 or more using the Internet, a mobile application, or any other electronic means deemed appropriate by the commission.  The mobile application shall allow for the validation of lottery tickets by persons using operating systems approved by the commission, including, but not limited to, the iOS and Android operating systems.  The commission shall establish procedures for the payment of winnings to winning ticket holders, which may include crediting amounts won to a players Internet or mobile application account or direct deposit into a players account at a financial institution. The commission may use employees of the Division of the State Lottery to establish and operate the Internet site or mobile application, or the commission may contract with one or more qualified vendors to establish and operate the program.  Any payments to a vendor shall be deemed to be an expense of the division in its operation of the lottery.  The commission shall ensure that the program includes security measures that are sufficient to protect against fraud, prevent underage persons from submitting and validating a claim, and protect the personal and financial information of players.  The program shall be implemented in a way that is consistent with any applicable federal laws and any agreements addressing this States participation in multi-state lotteries. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.